Tennessee, session 114, HB1795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-102-202, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) The officers and members of a masonic lodge, or a masonic lodge-
sponsored corporation or limited liability company, may take by deed through a purchase
or by gift real property, including any structure located upon the real property, and
personal property for the purposes of, but not limited to, building, maintaining, or
acquiring a masonic lodge, hall, or temple, or for a burial place.
(b) A deed for real or personal property described in subsection (a), whether
such deed effectuates a purchase or gift, must vest the legal title to such real or personal
property in the officers or members of the acquiring masonic lodge or in a masonic
lodge-sponsored corporation or limited liability company formed and organized for such
purpose.
(c) A masonic lodge-sponsored corporation or limited liability company may rent
or lease real or personal property to a masonic lodge or another entity on such terms
and conditions as such masonic lodge-sponsored corporation or limited liability company
may designate.
(d) This section does not affect a conveyance of real property or personal
property to a corporation or limited liability company which occurred prior to the effective
date of this act.
HB1795
009424
- 1 -

(e) As used in this section, "masonic lodge-sponsored corporation or limited
liability company" means a corporation or limited liability company that is incorporated or
organized under this title by the officers or members of a masonic lodge, and which acts
through officers or members authorized by such masonic lodge.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009424